Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-550
Wildlife; shipment in interstate commerce; when permitted.

Nothing in section 37-548 shall be construed to prevent the continuous shipment in interstate commerce of legally possessed live wildlife species or eggs of such species for breeding or stocking purposes when such shipment legally originates outside of this state and legally terminates outside of this state.

Laws 1993, LB 830, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-538;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 270;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 81.